










 























 



 First Community Corporation to Expand Upstate South Carolina Presence 
         










    










 













 











 



















First Community Corporation to Expand Upstate South Carolina Presence
        																																												
              
















 News provided by
First Community Corporation  
Apr 12, 2017, 09:00 ET









 Share this article




























































LEXINGTON, S.C. and EASLEY, S.C., April 12, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- First Community Corporation (Nasdaq:   FCCO), the holding company of First Community Bank, and Cornerstone Bancorp, the holding company of Cornerstone National Bank, jointly announced today the signing of a definitive merger agreement, under which First Community has agreed to acquire Cornerstone in a cash and stock transaction with a total current value of approximately $25.8 million, based on First Community's closing price of $20.60 per share as of April 10, 2017. The transaction value at the time of the merger may change due to changes in the price of First Community stock.








(Logo: http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20030508/FCCOLOGO )
On a pro forma combined basis, the combined company would have had approximately $1.059 billion in total assets, $892.5 million in total deposits, and $622.3 million in total loans as of December 31, 2016. The transaction will create a 19-office banking company with locations from the Upstate of South Carolina, through the Midlands and into the Central Savannah River Area to Augusta, Georgia.  The merger agreement has been unanimously approved by the Board of Directors of each company.  Closing of the transaction, which is expected to occur early in the fourth quarter of 2017, is subject to customary conditions, including regulatory approval and approval by the shareholders of Cornerstone.  
"This is a natural extension of our company in the Greenville market, which we entered with the activation of our Loan Production Office in March of 2016," said First Community President and CEO Michael C. "Mike" Crapps. "More importantly, we are excited to partner with the Cornerstone team.  The Board of Directors, Chairman and CEO Rodger Anthony and the entire team have created a successful banking organization, with a commitment to quality that permeates all aspects of their business.  We believe the combination of our banking companies will create a unique community based bank with the ability and financial strength to serve the banking needs of our communities and enhance shareholder value through operating advantages and efficiencies gained with the merger of our two institutions."  
Per the merger agreement, Cornerstone shareholders will have the right to receive $11.00 in cash or 0.54 shares of First Community common stock, or a combination thereof, for each share of Cornerstone common stock. The cash and stock elections are subject to proration to ensure that, excluding any dissenter shares, 30% of the outstanding Cornerstone common shares will be exchanged for $11.00 in cash and 70% of the outstanding Cornerstone common shares will be exchanged for shares of First Community common stock.
Rodger Anthony, CEO and Chairman of the Board of Cornerstone, said, "The Board of Directors of Cornerstone Bank, its Executive Officers, and I believe this merger opportunity will allow us to join together with an excellent company that is well capitalized and has much forward momentum.  This combination offers our shareholders a cash dividend and enhanced liquidity, as well as a premium on the capital they invested.  We are excited about the future of this combined company."   
Current Cornerstone Board members will have the opportunity to serve as members of First Community's Upstate Advisory Board.  Additionally, Mr. Anthony will serve the combined company in a consulting role for a six month period following the completion of the acquisition.  
Mr. Anthony commented, "Our customers will continue to receive the same high quality level of service from the bankers that have served them at Cornerstone Bank.  With First Community, we have found a shared passion for our work with local businesses and professionals.  This focus will continue and we are looking forward to the additional capacity and product lines that this combination of banks will bring to our customers."
Mr. Crapps also announced the initiation of the site selection process for a full service banking office in downtown Greenville. Crapps commented, "The staged progression of our Upstate strategy started with the hiring of a great team of bankers in Greenville in March of 2016 to activate our loan production office.  The team including Market President Coleman Kirven, Trey Werner and David Ramseur had an extremely successful first year and exceeded our expectations for loan portfolio growth.  The building out of our Upstate franchise through the combination of the acquisition of Cornerstone and the opening of a downtown Greenville office are natural next steps to more fully serving our customers and building value for our shareholders."
First Community was advised in the transaction by the Hovde Group, LLC as financial advisor and Nelson Mullins Riley & Scarborough LLP, as legal counsel.  Cornerstone was advised by Raymond James and Associates, Inc. as financial advisor, and Haynsworth Sinkler Boyd, P.A. as legal counsel.   
First Community Corporation 
First Community Corporation is the holding company for First Community Bank.  First Community is focused on providing financial solutions to local businesses and professionals through three lines of business at 15 full-service banking offices located in Lexington, Richland, Newberry, Kershaw and Aiken counties in South Carolina and Augusta, Georgia, a loan production office in Greenville, South Carolina, in addition to First Community Bank Mortgage and First Community Financial Consultants, a financial planning / investment advisory division.  
Cornerstone Bancorp
Cornerstone Bancorp is the holding company for Cornerstone National Bank.  The company currently operates three full-service financial centers located in Greenville, Easley and Powdersville South Carolina.  Cornerstone provides a high level of customer services through a dedicated and experienced team of 35 associates, all with extensive bank knowledge of the market areas and the communities that it serves.  
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS 
This press release contains certain forward-looking statements, including certain plans, expectations, goals, and projections, and including statements about the potential benefits of the merger between First Community and Cornerstone, which are subject to numerous assumptions, risks, and uncertainties.  Forward-looking statements are generally identifiable by the use of words such as "will, " "believe," "expect," "anticipate," "should," "could," "would," "plans," "intend," "project," "estimate," "goals," "forecast," "may" or similar expressions.  Actual results could differ materially from those anticipated by such forward-looking statements as a result of a variety of risks, uncertainties and other factors including, without limitation: the businesses of First Community and Cornerstone may not be integrated successfully or such integration may take longer to accomplish than expected; the expected cost savings and any revenue synergies from the merger may not be fully realized within the expected timeframes or at all; disruption from the merger may make it more difficult to maintain relationships with clients, associates, or suppliers; the required governmental approvals of the merger may not be obtained on the anticipated proposed terms and schedule or at all; Cornerstone shareholders may not approve the merger; changes in economic conditions; movements in interest rates; competitive pressures on product pricing, services and customer acquisition and retention; the degree of success and the timing of various business strategies; the nature, extent, and timing of governmental actions and reforms; and extended disruption of vital infrastructure; and other factors described in First Community's Annual Report on Form 10-K filed on March 13, 2017 and documents subsequently filed by First Community with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  All forward-looking statements included in this news release are based on information available at the time of this release.  Neither First Community nor Cornerstone assumes any obligation to update any forward-looking statement. 
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE MERGER AND WHERE TO FIND IT 
In connection with the merger, First Community will file with the Securities and Exchange Commission a registration statement on Form S-4 that will include a proxy statement/prospectus for the shareholders of Cornerstone. First Community also plans to file other documents with the Securities and Exchange Commission regarding the merger with Cornerstone. Cornerstone will mail the final proxy statement/prospectus to its shareholders. BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR VOTING DECISION, CORNERSTONE SHAREHOLDERS ARE URGED TO READ THE PROXY STATEMENT/ PROSPECTUS REGARDING THE MERGER AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT DOCUMENTS CAREFULLY IN THEIR ENTIRETY WHEN THEY BECOME AVAILABLE BECAUSE THEY WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE MERGER. The proxy statement/prospectus, as well as other filings containing information about First Community, will be available, without charge, at the SEC's website (http://www.sec.gov). Copies of the proxy statement/prospectus and the filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission that will be incorporated by reference in the proxy statement/ prospectus can also be obtained, without charge, by directing a request to First Community Corporation, 5455 Sunset Blvd., Lexington, SC 29072, Attention: Michael Crapps.     
This communication shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.
SOURCE First Community Corporation
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/first-community-corporation-to-expand-upstate-south-carolina-presence-300438431.html
SOURCE First Community Corporation



 

















Apr 19, 2017, 09:00 ET
Preview: First Community Corporation Announces First Quarter Results and Cash Dividend




















Jan 18, 2017, 09:00 ET
Preview: First Community Corporation Announces Record Earnings and Increased Cash Dividend








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 











Jul 19, 2017, 09:00 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              First Community Corporation Announces Second Quarter Results and...








 











May 17, 2017, 15:00 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Ed Tarver Elected to First Community Board of Directors





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
Acquisitions, Mergers and Takeovers








 You just read:
First Community Corporation to Expand Upstate South Carolina Presence


 News provided by
First Community Corporation  
Apr 12, 2017, 09:00 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 




10-Q: FIRST COMMUNITY CORP /SC/ - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,803
+6.93
+0.03%






Nasdaq

6,376
-6.36
-0.10%






S&P 500

2,470
-5.31
-0.21%









1:40 P.M. ET


Updated
      How your pet could make you a target for scammers
                                





 
1:39 P.M. ET


Updated
      Oil sets sights on biggest weekly gain of the year
                                





 
1:37 P.M. ET


                                  Gold prices log highest finish since mid-June, up 1.1% for the week
                                





 
1:37 P.M. ET


                                  August gold climbs $8.40, or 0.7%, to settle at $1,268.40.oz
                                





 
1:34 P.M. ET


                                  Stitch Fix has confidentially filed to go public: report
                                





 
1:31 P.M. ET


                                  Can China make the reflation trade great again?
                                





 
1:30 P.M. ET


Updated
      Get ready for the less-profitable Amazon that you used to know 
                                





 
1:29 P.M. ET


                                  Mattel stock price target cut to $19 from $22 at MKM Partners
                                





 
1:29 P.M. ET


                                  Electronic Arts stock price target raised to $132 from $126 at MKM Partners
                                





 
1:28 P.M. ET


                                  Exxon Mobil stock price target cut to $83 from $86 at CFRA
                                





 
1:27 P.M. ET


Updated
      The states where people spend the most on lotto tickets
                                





 
1:27 P.M. ET


                                  Tempur Sealy stock price target raised to $62 from $50 at CFRA
                                





 
1:27 P.M. ET


                                  Fiat Chrysler gets approval to sell diesel cars
                                





 
1:25 P.M. ET


Updated
      Starbucks’ Teavana stores are the latest casualty at the mall
                                





 
1:25 P.M. ET


Updated
      High Times is going public through a deal with a blank-check company — and here’s what that means
                                





 
1:25 P.M. ET


Updated
      Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
                                





 
1:24 P.M. ET


Updated
      Foxconn’s history of broken promises casts a shadow on Wisconsin news
                                





 
1:24 P.M. ET


Updated
      Tesla’s Model 3 will be launched with panache--and a party--later Friday
                                





 
1:16 P.M. ET


Updated
      All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
                                





 
1:14 P.M. ET


Updated
      Baker Hughes data show weekly U.S. oil-rig count up a third time this month
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: FIRST COMMUNITY CORP /SC/
    








    By

Published: Nov 10, 2016 10:37 a.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 2. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.  This report contains statements which constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Forward-looking statements may relate to, among other matters, the financial condition, results of operations, plans, objectives, future performance, and business of our Company. Forward-looking statements are based on many assumptions and estimates and are not guarantees of future performance. Our actual results may differ materially from those anticipated in any forward-looking statements, as they will depend on many factors about which we are unsure, including many factors which are beyond our control. The words "may," "would," "could," "should," "will," "expect," "anticipate," "predict," "project," "potential," "continue," "assume," "believe," "intend," "plan," "forecast," "goal," and "estimate," as well as similar expressions, are meant to identify such forward-looking statements. Potential risks and uncertainties that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those anticipated in our forward-looking statements include, without limitation, those described under the heading "Risk Factors" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015 as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") and the following:   credit losses as a result of, among other potential factors, declining real estate values, increasing interest rates, increasing unemployment, changes in customer payment behavior or other factors;   the amount of our loan portfolio collateralized by real estate and weaknesses in the real estate market;   restrictions or conditions imposed by our regulators on our operations;   the adequacy of the level of our allowance for loan losses and the amount of loan loss provisions required in future periods;   examinations by our regulatory authorities, including the possibility that the regulatory authorities may, among other things, require us to increase our allowance for loan losses or write-down assets;   reduced earnings due to higher other-than-temporary impairment charges resulting from additional decline in the value of our securities portfolio, specifically as a result of increasing default rates, and loss severities on the underlying real estate collateral;   increases in competitive pressure in the banking and financial services industries;   changes in the interest rate environment which could reduce anticipated or actual margins;   changes in political conditions or the legislative or regulatory environment, including governmental initiatives affecting the financial services industry;   general economic conditions resulting in, among other things, a deterioration in credit quality;   changes occurring in business conditions and inflation;   changes in access to funding or increased regulatory requirements with regard to funding;   increased cybersecurity risk, including potential business disruptions or financial losses;   changes in deposit flows;   changes in technology;   our current and future products, services, applications and functionality and plans to promote them;   changes in monetary and tax policies;   changes in accounting standards, policies, estimates, and practices;   our assumptions and estimates used in applying critical accounting policies, which may prove unreliable, inaccurate or not predictive of actual results;   the rate of delinquencies and amounts of loans charged-off;   the rate of loan growth in recent years and the lack of seasoning of a portion of our loan portfolio;   our ability to maintain appropriate levels of capital, including levels of capital required under the capital rules implementing Basel III;   our ability to attract and retain key personnel;   our ability to retain our existing clients, including our deposit relationships;   adverse changes in asset quality and resulting credit risk-related losses and expenses;   loss of consumer confidence and economic disruptions resulting from terrorist activities;   disruptions due to flooding, severe weather or other natural disasters; and   other risks and uncertainties detailed from time to time in our filings with the SEC.  Because of these and other risks and uncertainties, our actual future results may be materially different from the results indicated by any forward-looking statements. For additional information with respect to factors that could cause actual results to differ from the expectations stated in the forward-looking statements, see "Risk Factors" under Part I, Item 1A of our 2015 Annual Report on Form 10-K as filed with the SEC. In addition, our past results of operations do not necessarily indicate our future results. Therefore, we caution you not to place undue reliance on our forward-looking information and statements.  All forward-looking statements in this report are based on information available to us as of the date of this report. Although we believe that the expectations reflected in our forward-looking statements are reasonable, we cannot guarantee you that these expectations will be achieved. We undertake no obligation to publicly update or otherwise revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise.  Overview  The following discussion describes our results of operations for the nine months and three months ended September 30, 2016 as compared to the nine month and three month periods ended September 30, 2015 and also analyzes our financial condition as of September 30, 2016 as compared to December 31, 2015. Like most community banks, we derive most of our income from interest we receive on our loans and investments. Our primary source of funds for making these loans and investments is our deposits, on which we pay interest. Consequently, one of the key measures of our success is our amount of net interest income, or the difference between the income on our interest-earning assets, such as loans and investments, and the expense on our interest-bearing liabilities, such as deposits. Another key measure is the spread between the yield we earn on these interest-earning assets and the rate we pay on our interest-bearing liabilities.  There are risks inherent in all loans, so we maintain an allowance for loan losses to absorb probable losses on existing loans that may become uncollectible. We establish and maintain this allowance by charging a provision for loan losses against our operating earnings. In the following section we have included a discussion of this process, as well as several tables describing our allowance for loan losses and the allocation of this allowance among our various categories of loans.  In addition to earning interest on our loans and investments, we earn income through fees and other expenses we charge to our customers. We describe the various components of this non-interest income, as well as our non-interest expense, in the following discussion.  The following discussion and analysis identifies significant factors that have affected our financial position and operating results during the periods included in the accompanying financial statements. We encourage you to read this discussion and analysis in conjunction with the financial statements and the related notes and the other statistical information also included in this report.  Critical Accounting Policies  We have adopted various accounting policies that govern the application of accounting principles generally accepted in the United States and with general practices within the banking industry in the preparation of our financial statements. Our significant accounting policies are described in the footnotes to our unaudited consolidated financial statements as of September 30, 2016 and our notes included in the consolidated financial statements in our 2015 Annual Report on Form 10-K as filed with the SEC.  Certain accounting policies involve significant judgments and assumptions by us that have a material impact on the carrying value of certain assets and liabilities. We consider these accounting policies to be critical accounting policies. The judgment and assumptions we use are based on historical experience and other factors, which we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances. Because of the nature of the judgment and assumptions we make, actual results could differ from these judgments and estimates that could have a material impact on the carrying values of our assets and liabilities and our results of operations.  Allowance for Loan Losses  We believe the allowance for loan losses is the critical accounting policy that requires the most significant judgment and estimates used in preparation of our consolidated financial statements. Some of the more critical judgments supporting the amount of our allowance for loan losses include judgments about the credit worthiness of borrowers, the estimated value of the underlying collateral, the assumptions about cash flow, determination of loss factors for estimating credit losses, the impact of current events, and conditions, and other factors impacting the level of probable inherent losses. Under different conditions or using different assumptions, the actual amount of credit losses incurred by us may be different from management's estimates provided in our consolidated financial statements. Refer to the portion of this discussion that addresses our allowance for loan losses for a more complete discussion of our processes and methodology for determining our allowance for loan losses.  Goodwill and Other Intangibles  Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the sum of the estimated fair values of the tangible and identifiable intangible assets acquired less the estimated fair value of the liabilities assumed. Goodwill has an indefinite useful life and is evaluated for impairment annually or more frequently if events and circumstances indicate that the asset might be impaired. An impairment loss is recognized to the extent that the carrying amount exceeds the asset's fair value. Qualitative factors are assessed to first determine if it is more likely than not (more than 50%) that the carrying value of goodwill is less than fair value. These qualitative factors include but are not limited to overall deterioration in general economic conditions, industry and market conditions, and overall financial performance. If determined that it is more likely than not that there has been a deterioration in the fair value of the carrying value than the first of a two-step process would be performed. The first step, used to identify potential impairment, involves comparing each reporting unit's estimated fair value to its carrying value, including goodwill. If the estimated fair value of a reporting unit exceeds its carrying value, goodwill is considered not to be impaired. If the carrying value exceeds estimated fair value, there is an indication of potential impairment and the second step is performed to measure the amount of impairment.  If required, the second step involves calculating an implied fair value of goodwill for each reporting unit for which the first step indicated impairment. The implied fair value of goodwill is determined in a manner similar to the amount of goodwill calculated in a business combination, by measuring the excess of the estimated fair value of the reporting unit, as determined in the first step, over the aggregate estimated fair values of the individual assets, liabilities and identifiable intangibles as if the reporting unit was being acquired in a business combination. If the implied fair value of goodwill exceeds the carrying value of goodwill assigned to the reporting unit, there is no impairment. If the carrying value of goodwill assigned to a reporting unit exceeds the implied fair value of the goodwill, an impairment charge is recorded for the excess. An impairment loss cannot exceed the carrying value of goodwill assigned to a reporting unit, and the loss establishes a new basis in the goodwill. Subsequent reversal of goodwill impairment losses is not permitted. Management has determined that the Company has four reporting units (See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements).  Core deposit intangibles consist of costs that resulted from the acquisition of deposits from Savannah River and First South. Core deposit intangibles represent the estimated value of long-term deposit relationships acquired in this transaction. These costs are amortized over the estimated useful lives of the deposit accounts acquired on a method that we believe reasonably approximates the anticipated benefit stream from the accounts. The estimated useful lives are periodically reviewed for reasonableness.  Income Taxes and Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities  Income taxes are provided for the tax effects of the transactions reported in our consolidated financial statements and consist of taxes currently due plus deferred taxes related to differences between the tax basis and accounting basis of certain assets and liabilities, including available-for-sale securities, allowance for loan losses, write downs of OREO properties, accumulated depreciation, net operating loss carry forwards, accretion income, deferred compensation, intangible assets, and pension plan and post-retirement benefits. The deferred tax assets and liabilities represent the future tax return consequences of those differences, which will either be taxable or deductible when the assets and liabilities are recovered or settled. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are reflected at income tax rates applicable to the period in which the deferred tax assets or liabilities are expected to be realized or settled. A valuation allowance is recorded when it is "more likely than not" that a deferred tax asset will not be realized. As changes in tax laws or rates are enacted, deferred tax assets and liabilities are adjusted through the provision for income taxes. We file a consolidated federal income tax return for the Bank. At September 30, 2016 and December 31, 2015, we were in a net deferred tax asset position.  Other-Than-Temporary Impairment  We evaluate securities for other-than-temporary impairment at least on a quarterly basis. Consideration is given to (1) the length of time and the extent to which the fair value has been less than cost, (2) the financial condition and near-term prospects of the issuer, (3) the outlook for receiving the contractual cash flows of the investments, (4) the anticipated outlook for changes in the general level of interest rates, and (5) our intent and ability to retain our investment in the issuer for a period of time sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery in fair value or for a debt security whether it is more-likely-than-not that the Company will be required to sell the debt security prior to recovering its fair value (See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements).  Business Combinations, Method of Accounting for Loans Acquired  We account for acquisitions under FASB ASC Topic 805, Business Combinations, which requires the use of the acquisition method of accounting. All identifiable assets acquired, including loans, are recorded at fair value. No allowance for loan losses related to the acquired loans is recorded on the acquisition date because the fair value of the loans acquired incorporates assumptions regarding credit risk.  Acquired credit-impaired loans are accounted for under the accounting guidance for loans and debt securities acquired with deteriorated credit quality, found in FASB ASC Topic 310-30, Receivables-Loans and Debt Securities Acquired with Deteriorated Credit Quality. and initially measured at fair value, which includes estimated future credit losses expected to be incurred over the life of the loans. Loans acquired in business combinations with evidence of credit deterioration are considered impaired. Loans acquired through business combinations that do not meet the specific criteria of FASB ASC Topic 310-30, but for which a discount is attributable, at least in part to credit quality, are also accounted for under this guidance. Certain acquired loans, including performing loans and revolving lines of credit (consumer and commercial), are accounted for in accordance with FASB ASC Topic 310-20, where the discount is accreted through earnings based on estimated cash flows over the estimated life of the loan.  Comparison of Results of Operations for Nine Months Ended September 30, 2016 to the Nine Months Ended September 30, 2015  Net Income  Our net income for the nine months ended September 30, 2016 was $4.9 million or $0.72 diluted earnings per common share, as compared to $4.5 million or $0.68 diluted earnings per common share for the nine months ended September 30, 2015. Net interest income increased $760 thousand for the nine months ended September 30, 2016 as compared to the same period in 2015. This increase resulted from an increase in average earning assets, which increased by $51.1 million in the nine months ended September 30, 2016 as compared to the same period in 2015. Average earning assets were $759.3 million during the nine months ended September 30, 2015 as compared to $810.4 million during the nine months ended September 30, 2016. The net interest margin decreased to 3.24% during the first nine months of 2016 as compared to 3.33% during the first nine months of 2015. Non-interest income decreased by $135 thousand in the first nine months of 2016 compared to the first nine months of 2015. This was primarily attributable to a decrease in mortgage banking income and investment advisory fees and non-deposit commissions of $164 thousand and $122 thousand, respectively, in the nine months ended September 30, 2016 as compared to the same period in 2015. Non-interest expense in the nine months ended September 30, 2016 increased $702 thousand as compared to the same period in 2015, primarily as a result of an increase in salary and benefit expense of $654 thousand from $10.8 million in the first nine months of 2015 to $11.5 million in the first nine months of 2016.  Net Interest Income  Please refer to the table at the end of this Item 2 for the yield and rate data for interest-bearing balance sheet components during the nine-month periods ended September 30, 2016 and 2015, along with average balances and the related interest income and interest expense amounts.  Net interest income was $19.7 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2016 as compared to $18.9 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2015. The $760 thousand increase in net interest income was attributable to an increase in average earning assets of $51.7 million partially offset by a decrease of 9 basis points in the net interest margin between the two periods. Our net interest margin decreased 9 basis points from 3.33% for the nine months ended September 30, 2015 to 3.24% for the same period in 2016. The net interest margin was positively impacted during the first nine months of 2016 as a result of two pay-offs on purchased credit impaired loans. These two payoffs accounted for approximately 5 basis points in our net-interest margin for the nine months ended September 30, 2015. During the first nine months of 2016, the net interest margin was positively impacted by an investment that had been purchased at a discount and was called at par during the second quarter of 2016. The $82 thousand remaining discount recognized in interest income accounted for approximately 2 basis points of the net interest margin for the nine months ended September 30, 2016. The yield on earning assets decreased by 15 basis points in the first nine months of 2016 as compared to the same period in 2015. Average loans comprised 62.6% of average earning assets in the first nine months of 2016 as compared to 61.7% in the same period of 2015. The yield on our loan portfolio decreased 33 basis points in the nine month-period ended September 30, 2016 to 4.63% as compared to 4.96% during the same period in 2015. As previously noted, the yield on loans was positively impacted by recognizing the discount on two purchased impaired loans that paid off in the nine months ended September 30, 2015. The yield on our investment portfolio increased from 1.94% for the nine months ended September 30, 2015 to 2.04% for the same period in 2016. The previously mentioned $82 thousand discount recognized on a called bond accounted for approximately 4 basis points of the investment yield increase between the two periods. The cost of interest-bearing liabilities during the first nine months of 2016 was 0.50% as compared to 0.56% in the same period of 2015, reflecting a 6 basis point decrease. The continued focus and resulting shift in our deposit funding mix has continued to allow us to lower our overall cost of funds. Interest-bearing transaction accounts, money market accounts and savings deposits, which are typically our lower costing funds, represent 61.5% of our average interest bearing liabilities during the first nine months of 2016 as compared to 58.1% in the same period of 2015.  Provision and Allowance for Loan Losses  At September 30, 2016 and December 31, 2015, the allowance for loan losses was $5.0 million and $4.6 million, respectively. This represented 0.96% of total loans and 0.94% of total loans at September 30, 2016 and December 31, 2015, respectively. No allowance for loan losses related to the Savannah River acquired loans was recorded on the acquisition date, February 1, 2014, because the fair value of the loans acquired incorporates assumptions regarding credit risk. Loans acquired were recorded at the acquisition date fair value, which was based on expected cash flows and included an estimation of expected future loan losses for the purchased credit-impaired loans, including principal and interest. There have been no material adjustments to our original assumptions since the acquisition date. At September 30, 2016 and December 31, 2015, the allowance for loan losses plus the fair value adjustment related to credit as a percentage of total loans (excluding loans held for sale) was 1.03% and 1.15%, respectively. Our provision for loan losses was $536 thousand for the nine months ended September 30, 2016 as compared to $990 thousand for the nine months ended September 30, 2015. This provision is made based on our assessment of general loan loss risk and asset quality. The allowance for loan losses represents an amount which we believe will be adequate to absorb probable losses on existing loans that may become uncollectible. Our judgment as to the adequacy of the allowance for loan losses is based on a number of assumptions about future events, which we believe to be reasonable, but which may or may not prove to be accurate. Our determination of the allowance for loan losses is based on evaluations of the collectability of loans, including consideration of factors such as the balance of impaired loans, the quality, mix, and size of our overall loan portfolio, the experience ability and depth of lending personnel, economic conditions (local and national) that may affect the borrower's ability to repay, the amount and quality of collateral securing the loans, our historical loan loss experience, and a review of specific problem loans. We also consider subjective issues such as changes in the lending policies and procedures, changes in the local/national economy, changes in volume or type of credits, changes in volume/severity of problem loans, quality of loan review and board of director oversight, and concentrations of credit. Periodically, we adjust the amount of the allowance based on changing circumstances. We charge recognized losses to the allowance and add subsequent recoveries back to the allowance for loan losses.  We perform an analysis quarterly to assess the risk within the loan portfolio. The portfolio is segregated into similar risk components for which historical loss ratios are calculated and adjusted for identified changes in current portfolio characteristics. Historical loss ratios are calculated by product type and by regulatory credit risk classification (See Note 4 - Loans). The annualized weighted average loss ratios over the last 36 months for loans classified substandard, special mention and pass have been approximately 5.70%, 3.11% and 0.04%, respectively. The allowance consists of an allocated and unallocated allowance. The allocated portion is determined by types and ratings of loans within the portfolio. The unallocated portion of the allowance is established for losses that exist in the remainder of the portfolio and compensates for uncertainty in estimating the loan losses. The allocated portion of the allowance is based on historical loss experience as well as certain qualitative factors as explained above. The qualitative factors have been established based on certain assumptions made as a result of the current economic conditions and are adjusted as conditions change to be directionally consistent with these changes. The unallocated portion of the allowance is composed of factors based on management's evaluation of various conditions that are not directly measured in the estimation of probable losses through the experience formula or specific allowances. The unallocated allowance of the portfolio is primarily identified through discussions with senior credit management and through consideration of various portfolio specifics and other uncertainties outside of our markets that could impact the risk inherent in the portfolio. These include factors such as uncertainty as to a sustainable economic recovery, ongoing global economic conditions and sustained levels of high national unemployment. Given these uncertainties in economic conditions and particularly real estate valuations, we do not believe it would be prudent to reduce substantially the overall level of our allowance at this time. As economic conditions show sustainable improvement, we believe the unallocated portion of the allowance should decrease as a percentage of the total allowance.  Our loan portfolio consists of a large percentage of real estate secured loans. Impaired values of the underlying real estate collateral as well as a slowdown in both residential and commercial real estate sales could impact our ability to sell collateral upon foreclosure. The real estate collateral in each case provides an alternate source of repayment in the event of default by the borrower and may deteriorate in value during the time the credit is extended. If real estate values decline, it is also more likely that we would be required to increase our allowance for loan losses. If during a period of reduced real estate values we are required to liquidate the property collateralizing a loan to satisfy the debt or to increase the allowance for loan losses, it could materially reduce our profitability and adversely affect our financial condition.  Non-performing assets were $5.2 million (0.57% of total assets) at September 30, 2016 as compared to $5.9 million (0.66% of total assets), $7.5 million (0.86% of total assets) and $7.3 million (0.85% of total assets) at June 30, 2016, March 31, 2016 and December 31, 2015, respectively. While we believe our amount of non-performing assets compares favorably to current industry results (both nationally and locally), we continue to be concerned about the impact of this economic environment on our customer base of local businesses and professionals. There were 40 loans, totaling $4.0 million, included in non-performing status (non-accrual loans and loans past due 90 days and still accruing) at September 30, 2016. The largest non-performing loan is a $964 thousand first mortgage on developed lots to be sold for residential use. The average balance of the remaining 38 loans is approximately $105.0 thousand and the majority of these loans are secured by first mortgage liens. At the time the loans are placed in non-accrual status, we typically obtain an updated appraisal and, if the loan balance exceeds fair value, write the balance down to the fair value. At September 30, 2016, we had one loan delinquent more than 90 days in the amount of $99 thousand and still accruing interest. At September 30, 2016, we had loans totaling $2.7 million that were delinquent 30 days to 89 days which represented 0.52% of total loans.  Our management continuously monitors non-performing, classified and past due . . .  Nov 10, 2016  (c) 1995-2016 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Tesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?


Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’


Hillary Clinton’s new book ‘What Happened’ makes for hilarious R-rated internet















Most Popular





All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart





Stock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses





Get ready for the less-profitable Amazon that you used to know





Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’





What 'Flash Boys' Brad Katsuyama thinks is killing Wall Street trade




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 








































 



 First Community Corporation and Savannah River Financial Corporation Announce Shareholder Approval 
         










    










 






 











 









First Community Corporation and Savannah River Financial Corporation Announce Shareholder Approval of Merger

Jan 30, 2014, 09:00 ET
		  		  																				
						 from   First Community Corporation 











 
















































 

 















































 

 

 
 
 
 







First Community Corporation logo. (PRNewsFoto/First Community Corporation)    
 Facebook
 Twitter
 Pinterest

































 




 




First Community Corporation logo. (PRNewsFoto/First Community Corporation)
 


 

 




 





 


LEXINGTON, S.C., AUGUSTA, Ga., and AIKEN, S.C., Jan. 30, 2014 /PRNewswire/ -- First Community Corporation ("First Community") (Nasdaq:   FCCO), the holding company of First Community Bank, and Savannah River Financial Corporation ("Savannah River"), the holding company of Savannah River Banking Company, jointly announced today that the previously announced merger under which First Community will acquire Savannah River has received the necessary approvals from the shareholders of both companies.  A special meeting of First Community's shareholders was held on January 29, 2014, to approve the issuance of shares of common stock of First Community as merger consideration.  A special meeting of Savannah River's shareholders was also held on January 29, 2014, to approve the merger agreement.  First Community and Savannah River intend to complete the merger effective as of February 1, 2014.
(Logo: http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20030508/FCCOLOGO) 
"We are very excited to move forward with the combination of our organizations," said First Community President and CEO Michael C. "Mike" Crapps.  "As our teams have worked to prepare to combine the operations of our two banks and as we have learned more about each other and our markets, we are even more excited about this partnership.  This is a comfortable extension of our company into a contiguous county, and beyond into Augusta.  The Central Savannah River Area (CSRA) and the midlands of South Carolina have many economic similarities, and both are experiencing nice momentum in business growth.  More importantly, we are excited to partner with the Savannah River Banking Company team.  The Board of Directors, CEO Randy Potter, President Jeff Spears, and the entire team have created a successful banking organization, with a commitment to quality that permeates all aspects of their business.  This includes the talent of the staff, their approach to serving their clients, and is evident in the quality of their balance sheet."  
Mr. Paul S. Simon, Chairman of the Board of SRFC, said, "The Board of Directors of the Savannah River Financial Corporation, its Executive Officers, and I are pleased that the merger has received all of the necessary approvals and are excited to join together with an excellent company that is well capitalized and has forward momentum.  We are excited about the future of this combined company."   
Savannah River President Jeff Spears commented, "Our clients will continue to receive the same high quality level of service from the same bankers that have served them at SRFC.  With First Community, we have found a shared passion for our work with local businesses and professionals.  This focus will continue and we are looking forward to the additional capacity and product lines that this combination of banks will bring to our clients."
First Community Corporation 
First Community Corporation is the holding company for First Community Bank.  The company currently operates 11 full-service banking offices throughout the midlands of South Carolina in Lexington, Richland, Newberry and Kershaw counties.  First Community is focused on providing financial solutions to local businesses and professionals through three lines of business, including commercial and retail banking, mortgage banking, and financial planning and investment advisory services.  
Savannah River Financial Corporation
Savannah River Financial Corporation is the holding company for Savannah River Banking Company.  The company currently operates 2 full-service financial centers located in Augusta, GA and Aiken, SC.  Savannah River provides a high level of client services through a dedicated and experienced team of over 30 associates, all with extensive bank knowledge of the CSRA market and the other communities that it serves.  
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements, including certain plans, expectations, goals, and projections, including statements about the benefits of the merger between First Community and Savannah River, which are subject to numerous assumptions, risks, and uncertainties.  Actual results could differ materially from those anticipated by such statements for a variety of factors including, without limitation: the businesses of First Community and Savannah River may not be integrated successfully or such integration may take longer to accomplish than expected; the expected cost savings and any revenue synergies from the merger may not be fully realized within the expected timeframes; disruption from the merger may make it more difficult to maintain relationships with clients, associates, or suppliers; changes in economic conditions; movements in interest rates; competitive pressures on product pricing and services; success and timing of other business strategies; the nature, extent, and timing of governmental actions and reforms; and extended disruption of vital infrastructure; and other factors described in First Community's Annual Report on Form 10-K and documents subsequently filed by First Community with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC").  All forward-looking statements included in this news release are based on information available at the time of the release.  Neither First Community nor Savannah River assumes any obligation to update any forward-looking statement. 
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE MERGER AND WHERE TO FIND IT 
First Community has filed relevant documents concerning the transaction with the SEC, including a registration statement on Form S-4 that includes a joint proxy statement/prospectus, and may file additional documents with the SEC.  Shareholders will be able to obtain a free copy of the joint proxy statement/prospectus, as well as other filings by First Community, at the SEC's internet site (http://www.sec.gov).  Copies of the joint proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant First Community filings with the SEC can also be obtained, without charge, by directing a request to First Community Corporation, 5455 Sunset Blvd., Lexington, SC 29072, Attention:  Michael C. Crapps.
SHAREHOLDERS ARE URGED TO READ THE JOINT PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS (INCLUDING ALL AMENDMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTS THERETO), AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT DOCUMENTS FILED WITH THE SEC IF AND WHEN THEY BECOME AVAILABLE BECAUSE THEY WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION REGARDING THE PROPOSED MERGER. 
The directors and executive officers of First Community and other persons may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from First Community shareholders in connection with the proposed merger.  Information regarding First Community's directors and executive officers is available in its definitive proxy statement (form type DEF 14A) and additional definitive proxy soliciting materials filed with the SEC for First Community's 2013 annual shareholder meeting.  Information regarding the participants in the First Community proxy solicitation and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, will be contained in the joint proxy statement/prospectus filed with the SEC and may be contained in additional documents that may be filed with the SEC if and when such information become available.
This communication shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.
 SOURCE  First Community Corporation  




  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  
















Apr 16, 2014, 09:00 ET
Preview: First Community Corporation Announces First Quarter Results and Cash Dividend




















Jan 22, 2014, 09:00 ET
Preview: First Community Corporation Announces Annual and Fourth Quarter Results along with Cash Dividend








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Read More











Apr 19, 2017, 09:00 ET
First Community Corporation Announces Second Quarter Results and...














Apr 19, 2017, 09:00 ET
Ed Tarver Elected to First Community Board of Directors














Apr 19, 2017, 09:00 ET
First Community Corporation Announces First Quarter Results and...











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 


MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




1:42 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
1:40pHow your pet could make you a target for scammers
1:39pOil sets sights on biggest weekly gain of the year
1:38pAugust gold climbs $8.40, or 0.7%, to settle at $1,268.40.oz
1:38pGold prices log highest finish since mid-June, up 1.1% for the week
1:34pStitch Fix has confidentially filed to go public: report
1:32pCan China make the reflation trade great again?
1:31pGet ready for the less-profitable Amazon that you used to know 
1:30pMattel stock price target cut to $19 from $22 at MKM Partners
1:29pElectronic Arts stock price target raised to $132 from $126 at MKM Partners
1:28pExxon Mobil stock price target cut to $83 from $86 at CFRA
1:28pThe states where people spend the most on lotto tickets
1:28pTempur Sealy stock price target raised to $62 from $50 at CFRA
1:27pFiat Chrysler gets approval to sell diesel cars
1:26pStarbucks’ Teavana stores are the latest casualty at the mall
1:25pHigh Times is going public through a deal with a blank-check company — and here’s what that means
1:25pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
1:25pFoxconn’s history of broken promises casts a shadow on Wisconsin news
1:24pTesla’s Model 3 will be launched with panache--and a party--later Friday
1:16pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
1:14pBaker Hughes data show weekly U.S. oil-rig count up a third time this month
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,803.48

+6.93
+0.03%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,375.83

-6.36
-0.10%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,470.13

-5.29
-0.21%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15

















































  FCCO:NASDAQ CM Stock Quote - First Community Corp/SC - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  First Community Corp/SC   FCCO:US   NASDAQ CM        20.85USD   0.00   0.00%     As of 12:29 PM EDT 7/28/2017     Open   21.49    Day Range   20.80 - 21.49    Volume   1,995    Previous Close   20.85    52Wk Range   14.41 - 23.55    1 Yr Return   41.57%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   21.49    Day Range   20.80 - 21.49    Volume   1,995    Previous Close   20.85    52Wk Range   14.41 - 23.55    1 Yr Return   41.57%    YTD Return   15.51%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   16.77    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   1.28    Market Cap (m USD)   143.929    Shares Outstanding  (m)   6.697    Price/Sales (TTM)   3.48    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   1.68%        Sector Financials   % Price Change -0.04%     Industry Banks   % Price Change -0.54%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     7/19/2017   First Community Corporation Announces Second Quarter Results and Cash Dividend     5/17/2017   Ed Tarver Elected to First Community Board of Directors     4/19/2017   First Community Corporation Announces First Quarter Results and Cash Dividend     4/12/2017   First Community Corporation to Expand Upstate South Carolina Presence    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   First Community Corporation operates as a bank holding company. The Bank, through its subsidiaries, provides commercial and retail banking services. First Community offers its services to small-to-medium sized businesses, professionals and individuals throughout South Carolina.    Address  5455 Sunset BlvdLexington, SC 29072United States   Phone  1-803-951-2265   Website   www.firstcommunitysc.com     Executives Board Members    Michael C Crapps "Mike"  President/CEO    Joseph G Sawyer  Exec VP/CFO    David K Proctor  Exec VP/Chief Risk Officer    Robin D Brown  Exec VP/Chief Mktg Ofcr    J Ted Nissen  Exec VP/Chief Commercial Ofcr     Show More         


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft






















Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.








First Community Corporation 
2006 Non-employee Director Deferred Compensation Plan - Employee Benefits Plan Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Employee Benefits Plan Agreement     > FIRST COMMUNITY CORPORATION 
2006 NON-EMPLOYEE DIRECTOR DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















First Community Corporation 
2006 Non-employee Director Deferred Compensation Plan
Employee Benefits Plan Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Employee Benefits Plan Agreement involves FIRST COMMUNITY CORP /SC/. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: FIRST COMMUNITY CORPORATION 
2006 NON-EMPLOYEE DIRECTOR DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN Governing Law: South Carolina      Date: 10/4/2006 Industry: Regional Banks        









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day









FIRST COMMUNITY CORPORATION

2006 NON-EMPLOYEE DIRECTOR DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN
Adopted as of September 30, 2006
1.          
Purpose



 


The Plan is
hereby established to permit non-employee directors of First
Community Corporation and its subsidiaries, in recognition of their
contributions to the Corporation and such subsidiaries, to receive
Shares in the manner described below. The Plan is intended to
enable the Corporation to attract, retain and motivate qualified
directors and to enhance the long-term mutuality of interest
between directors and shareholders of the Corporation. The purpose
of the Plan is to provide non-employee directors of the Corporation
with an opportunity to defer their cash Compensation for
Corporation stock.






2.          
Effective Date
            
(a)       This Plan shall become
effective on August 15, 2006.
3.          
Definitions
            
In this Plan, the following definitions apply:
            
“Account” means the account maintained by the
Corporation for deferred stock units credited under Section
6.
            
“Administrator” means the Secretary of the Corporation,
or a designated third party administrator.



 


“Annual
Deferral Amount” shall mean that portion of a
Participant’s director fees that a Participant defers in
accordance with Section 5 for any one Plan year, without regard to
whether such amounts are withheld and credited during such Plan
year. In the event of a Participant’s Retirement, Disability,
Death or other separation from service with the Corporation and all
subsidiaries prior to the end of a Plan year, such year’s
Annual Deferral Amount shall be the actual amount withheld prior to
such event.






            
“Board” means the board of directors of the
Corporation.



 


“Change
in Control” shall mean any “change in control
event” as defined in accordance with Code Section 409A and
related Treasury guidance and Regulations.









 


“Compensation” shall mean the annual
retainer fees earned by a non-employee director for service as a
director of the Corporation or any subsidiary, the annual retainer
fee, if any, earned by a non-employee director for service as a
member of a committee of the Board or of the board of directors of
any subsidiary; and any fees earned by a non-employee director for
attendance at meetings of the Board or the board of directors of
any subsidiary and of any of their committees.






            
“Corporation” means First Community Corporation, a
South Carolina corporation, and its successors.



 


“Deferral
Account” shall mean (i) the sum of all of a
Participant’s Annual Deferral Amounts, plus (ii) amounts
credited or debited to the Participant’s Deferral Account in
accordance with this Plan, less (iii) all distributions made to the
Participant or his or her beneficiary pursuant to this Plan that
relate to his or her Deferral Account.






1



FIRST COMMUNITY CORPORATION

2006 NON-EMPLOYEE DIRECTOR DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN
Adopted as of September 30, 2006



 


“Deferred
stock unit” means a credit to a Participant’s account
under Section 6(c) that represents the right to receive a number of
Corporation shares based on the deferred amount divided by the Fair
Market Value of one share as of the date the account is
credited.









 


“Disability” or
“Disabled” shall mean that a Participant is (i) unable
to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any
medically determinable physical or mental impairment which can be
expected to result in death or can be expected to last for a
continuous period of not less than 12 months, or (ii) by reason of
any medically determinable physical or mental impairment which can
be expected to result in death or can be expected to last for a
continuous period of not less than 12 months, receiving income
replacement benefits for a period of not less than 3 months under
an accident or health plan covering employees of the
Participant’s employer. For purposes of this Plan, a
Participant shall be deemed Disabled if determined to be totally
disabled by the Social Security Administration, or if determined to
be disabled in accordance with the applicable disability insurance
program of such Participant’s employer, provided that the
definition of “disability” applied under such
disability insurance program complies with the requirements in the
preceding sentence.






            
“Effective Date” means August 15, 2006.



 


“Fair
Market Value” shall mean on any date, with respect to a
Share, the closing price of a Share as reported by the NASDAQ Stock
Market (or the exchange on which the Shares then trade) on the next
preceding date on which there was such a trade.









 


“Non-employee director” means a
member of the Board who is not also an employee of the Corporation
or any subsidiary or other affiliate of the Corporation.






            
“Participant” means each non-employee director who
elects to defer Compensation under this Plan.



 


“Plan” means this First Community
Corporation 2006 Non-Employee Director Deferred Compensation Plan,
as it may be amended from time to time.









 


“Retire” or “Retired” or
“Retirement” shall mean separation from service as a
director with the Corporation and all subsidiaries, as provided in
the Bylaws of First Community Corporation, Article 3, Section
6.






            
“Share” means a share of common stock of the
Corporation.



 


“Termination of the Plan” shall mean
a determination by the Board that (i) all of its Participants shall
no longer be eligible to participate in the Plan, (ii) no new
deferral elections for such Participants shall be permitted, and
(iii) such Participants shall no longer be eligible to receive
Corporation contributions under this Plan.









 


“Unforeseeable Emergency” shall mean
a severe financial hardship of the Participant or his or her
beneficiary resulting from (i) an illness or accident of the
Participant or beneficiary, the Participant’s or
beneficiary’s spouse, or the Participant’s or
beneficiary’s dependent (as defined in Code Section 152(a)),
(ii) a loss of the Participant’s or beneficiary’s
property due to casualty, or (iii) such other similar
extraordinary and unforeseeable circumstances arising as a result
of events beyond the control of the Participant or the
Participant’s beneficiary, all as determined in the sole
discretion of the Board



 
2



FIRST COMMUNITY CORPORATION

2006 NON-EMPLOYEE DIRECTOR DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN
Adopted as of September 30, 2006
            
but such determination to be made in compliance with Code Section
409A and related Treasury guidance and Regulations.
4.          
Administration



 


The Board and,
subject to the oversight of the Board, the Administrator shall have
authority to administer the Plan, including conclusive authority to
construe and interpret the Plan, to establish rules, policies,
procedures, forms, and notices for use in carrying out the Plan,
and to make all other determinations necessary or desirable for
administration of the Plan.






5.          
Election to Defer Compensation



 


On or before
December 31 of any calendar year, a non-employee director may elect
to defer receipt of all or any part of any Compensation payable in
respect of the calendar year following the year in which such
election is made, and to have such amounts credited to a Deferral
Account. Any person who shall become a non-employee director during
any calendar year may elect, not later than the 30th day after his
or her term as a director b





 








 























FCCO stock quote - First Community Corporation Common Stock price - NASDAQ.com










































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search



























Home > 
    Quotes > 
    FCCO
















First Community Corporation Common Stock Quote & Summary Data 


$20.85
*  
unch

unch
Get FCCO Alerts



				        *Delayed - data as of Jul. 28, 2017 13:27 ET  - 
				        
				            Find a broker to begin trading FCCO now
				        




Exchange:NASDAQ 
Industry: Finance 
Community Rating:  
View: 
 
				    FCCO Real Time



















FCCO





 










 







Edit Symbol List




Symbol Lookup























Real Time
NLS Trade Reporting
FlashQuotes
InfoQuotes
Summary Quote
Charts
Interactive Charts
Pre-Market Charts
After Hours Charts
Revenue / EPS Summary
Company Financials
- View Competitors
- Short Interest
Company News
Press Releases
Company News
Press Releases
Sentiment
Analyst Stock Research
Stock Report
SEC Filings
- Holdings/Insider Summary
- Institutional Holdings
- Insider Form 4

Equity Options
Pre-Market Quotes
After Hours Quotes
Company Research
- StockConsultant
Stock Comparison
- Guru Analysis
Annual Report
Historical Quotes
Call Transcripts
Dividend History
Lynch Analysis
Graham Analysis
Validea Momentum Analysis
Fool Analysis
Dreman Analysis
Zweig Analysis
Fisher Analysis
OShaughnessy Analysis
ETF detail
ETF Profile
Comparison Charts



Symbol List Views
FlashQuotes
InfoQuotes
 
                    Stock Details
           
        
Summary Quote
Real-Time Quote
After Hours Quote
Pre-market Quote
Historical Quote
Option Chain
CHARTS
Basic Chart
Interactive Chart

		        
    
                COMPANY NEWS
Company Headlines
Press Releases
Market Stream
STOCK ANALYSIS
Analyst Research
Guru Analysis
Stock Report
Competitors
Stock Consultant
Stock Comparison
FUNDAMENTALS
Call Transcripts
Annual Report
Income Statement
Revenue/EPS
SEC Filings
Short Interest
Dividend History
HOLDINGS
Ownership Summary
Institutional Holdings
Insiders(SEC Form 4)






CLOSEX


Edit Symbol List



Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.








Go Now

Clear List






            Don't know the stock symbol?  Use the 
            Symbol Lookup tool.
	        
Alphabetize the sort order of my symbols
		






CLOSEX


 
Symbol Lookup











CLOSEX
Investing just got easier…
Sign up now to become a NASDAQ.com member and begin receiving instant notifications when key events occur that affect the stocks you follow.

Access Now











 Save Stocks











































News




PriceCharts






TradeHistory





Annual Report










EarningsReport Date





Dynamic quotes: Turn Off


















                                            Best Bid/Ask
                                            


                                                    "Best Bid" is the highest price currently being offered for a block of stock.
                                                    
                                                    "Best Ask" is the lowest price currently being asked for a block of stock.
                                                




$ 20.80 / $ 21.10


1 Year Target
22




                                            Today's High /Low
                                            


                                                    "Today's High" The highest sales price the stock has achieved during the regular trading hours, the intra-day high.
                                                    
                                                    "Today's Low" The lowest sales price the stock has fallen to during the regular trading hours, the intra-day low.
                                                




$ 21.4912 / $ 20.80




                                            Share Volume
                                            


                                                    "Share Volume" is the number of shares of the stock traded on the listing exchange during current trading hours. It does not include after hours volume.
                                                





1,995





                                        50 Day Avg. Daily Volume
                                        


                                                This is the average share volume for the past 50 trading days, for NASDAQ stocks and 90 trading days for Non-NASDAQ stocks. This field allows you to compare today's trading to the average daily volume. 
                                            




5,850




                                            Previous Close
                                            


                                                    "Previous Close" is the previous trading day's last reported trade price during official trading hours.
                                                




$ 20.85




                                            52 Week High/Low
                                            


                                                    "52 Week High" is the highest sales price the stock has achieved during the regular trading hours during the most recent 52 week period.
                                                    
                                                    "52 Week Low" is the lowest sales price the stock has fallen to during the regular trading hours during the most recent 52 week period.
                                                





                                        $ 23.55 / $ 14.41
                                    


 



                                            Market cap
                                            


	                                                “Market Capitalization” is a measure of the estimated value of the common equity securities of the company or their equivalent. It does not include securities convertible into the common equity securities. “Market Capitalization” is derived from the last sale price for the displayed class of listed securities and the total number of shares outstanding for both listed and unlisted securities (as applicable). NASDAQ does not use this value to determine compliance with the listing requirements.
                                                




$ 139,729,236 




                                            P/E Ratio
                                            


                                                    "P/E Ratio" is a statistic calculated by dividing the price of a stock by the reported actual earnings per share of the issuing firm (not the same as the projected P/E ratio); it is also called the "multiple".
                                                




20.64




                                        Forward P/E(1y)
                                            


                                                        A widely used stock evaluation measure. For a security, the Price/Earnings Ratio is given by dividing the Last Sale Price by the Average EPS (Earnings Per Share) Estimate for the specified fiscal time period. The forward P/E refers to the value for the next full year. 
                                                    




19.49




                                            Earnings Per Share (EPS)
                                            


	                                                    The EPS listed on our infoquote and Summary Quote page is "12-mos Rolling". EPS represents the portion of a company's profit allocated to each outstanding share of common stock. Net income (reported or estimated) for a period of time is divided by the total number of shares outstanding (TSO) during that period; See growth rate measures for EPS. Our vendor's methodology for the EPS on the infoquote and Summary Quote pages follows the EPS used by the majority of the analysts following the stock, in many cases this is EBITDA EPS. 
	                                                




$ 1.01


Annualized dividend
$ .36




                                            Ex Dividend Date
                                            


                                                    The data is based on historical ex-dividend data & doesn’t include upcoming values.  Visit the dividend history page to see the upcoming dividend information.
                                                




7/27/2017


Dividend Payment Date
8/14/2017




                                            Current Yield
                                            


                                                    Indicated yield represents annual dividends divided by current stock price. The data is based on historical ex-dividend data & doesn’t include upcoming values.  Visit the dividend history page to see the upcoming dividend information.
                                                




1.73 %




                                            Beta
                                            


                                                    "Beta" is a volatility measurement of a stock mutual fund or ETF versus a comparable benchmark like the S&P 500 stock index. A stock fund or ETF with a higher beta than the S&P 500 will rise or fall to a greater degree. In contrast, a stock fund or ETF with a low beta will rise or fall less.
                                                




2.65




                                            NASDAQ Official Open Price
                                            


	                                                NASDAQ Official Opening Price: This process identifies the NASDAQ-specific opening prices for NASDAQ-listed issues.
	                                                




$ 20.95




									            Date of Open Price
									            


											            "Date of Open Price" This field refers to the date the NASDAQ Official Open Price was disseminated for a given stock. It is possible that the date will not be from the current trading day; this indicates that the stock didn't trade on NASDAQ during the current trading day. The NASDAQ Official Open Price is updated only when the stock is traded on NASDAQ. 
											            




Jul. 28, 2017




                                        NASDAQ Official Close Price
                                        


                                                    "NASDAQ Official Closing Price (NOCP)" is a process for identifying the NASDAQ market-specific closing price for NASDAQ-listed issues.
                                                    




$ 21.15




                                            Date of Close Price
                                            


	                                                This field refers to the date the NOCP was disseminated for a given stock. It is possible that the date will not be from the prior day; this indicates that the stock didn't trade on NASDAQ on the prior day. The NOCP is updated only when the stock is traded on NASDAQ. 
	                                                




Jul. 27, 2017


Community Sentiment







Intraday Chart




5d


1m


6m


12m


More Charting













Company Description (as filed with the SEC)
First Community Corporation (the "Company"), a bank holding company registered
under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, was incorporated under the laws of
South Carolina in 1994 primarily to own and control all of the capital stock of
First Community Bank (the "Bank"), which commenced operations in August 1995.
The Bank's primary federal regulator is the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation (the "FDIC"). The Bank is also regulated and examined by the South
Carolina Board of Financial Institutions (the "S.C. Board").

We engage in a commercial banking business from our main office in Lexington,
South Carolina and our 15 full-service offices located in the Midlands of South
Carolina to include: Lexington County (6), Richland County (4), Newberry County
(2) and Kershaw County (1) and the Central Savannah River area to include: Aiken
County (1) and Augusta (1) which is located in Richmond County, Georgia.  ... More ...  




Risk Grade

			        Where does FCCO fit in the risk graph?
				
































News for FCCO









                        First Community Corporation (FCCO) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for July 27, 2017
                    

7/26/2017 9:00:03 AM - NASDAQ.com News



                        First Community Corporation (FCCO) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for April 27, 2017
                    

4/26/2017 9:00:03 AM - NASDAQ.com News



                        Top Ranked Momentum Stocks to Buy for April 13th
                    

4/13/2017 8:37:00 AM - Zacks.com



                        Is First Community (FCCO) Stock a Solid Choice Right Now?
                    

4/4/2017 8:42:00 AM - Zacks.com



                        Dividend Champions For February 2017
                    

2/1/2017 5:56:00 AM - Seeking Alpha




 Subscribe


                More FCCO News & Commentary



                Read FCCO Press Releases





















Consensus Recommendation


















Analyst Info


Annual EPS Est:
$0.98


Quarterly EPS Est:
0.29


PEG Ratio:
.02


Mean Recommendation:
1.67




            Data is provided by Zacks Investment Research





View All



View Summary


































CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX













































    FCCO Key Statistics - First Community Corp. (South Carolina) Financial Ratios - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































First Community Corp. (South Carolina)

                  NASDAQ: FCCO
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

First Community Corp. (South Carolina)



Market open
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 28, 2017, 12:29 p.m.


FCCO

/quotes/zigman/70487/composite


$
20.85




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 1,995
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/70487/composite
Previous close

$
			20.85
		


$
				20.85
			
Change

0.00
0.00%





Day low
Day high
$20.80
$21.49










52 week low
52 week high

            $14.41
        

            $23.55
        

















			Company Description 


			First Community Corp. (South Carolina) is a bank holding company, which provides commercial banking services. It operates through the following segments: Commercial and Retail Banking; Mortgage Banking; Investment Advisory and Non-Deposit; and Corporate. The Commercial and Retail Banking segment off...
		


                First Community Corp. (South Carolina) is a bank holding company, which provides commercial banking services. It operates through the following segments: Commercial and Retail Banking; Mortgage Banking; Investment Advisory and Non-Deposit; and Corporate. The Commercial and Retail Banking segment offers loans and deposits to retail and commercial clients. The Mortgage Banking segment includes real estate loans. The Investment Advisory and Non-Deposit segment provides investment management services. The Corporate segment refers to dividend income, interest, and parent company financial information. The company was founded on November 2, 1994 and is headquartered in Lexington, SC.
            




Valuation

P/E Current
21.12


P/E Ratio (without extraordinary items)
18.42


Price to Sales Ratio
3.15


Price to Book Ratio
1.48


Price to Cash Flow Ratio
15.55


Enterprise Value to EBITDA
16.68


Enterprise Value to Sales
4.60


Total Debt to Enterprise Value
0.35

Efficiency

Revenue/Employee
192,599.00


Income Per Employee
33,079.00


Total Asset Turnover
0.04



Profitability

Operating Margin
24.37


Pretax Margin
22.75


Net Margin
17.18


Return on Assets
0.75


Return on Equity
8.31


Return on Total Capital
4.77


Return on Invested Capital
5.84

Capital Structure

Total Debt to Total Equity
71.49


Total Debt to Total Capital
41.69


Total Debt to Total Assets
6.39


Long-Term Debt to Equity
34.20


Long-Term Debt to Total Capital
19.94





      Officers and Executives
    



Name
Age
Officer Since
Title





Mr. Michael C. Crapps 
57
1994
President, Chief Executive Officer & Director



Ms. Tanya A. Butts 
58
2017
Chief Operating & Risk Officer, Executive VP



Mr. Joseph G. Sawyer 
66
1995
CFO, Principal Accounting Officer & EVP



Mr. J. Ted Nissen 
55
1995
Chief Commercial & Retail Banking Officer, EVP



Mr. David K. Proctor 
60
1995
Chief Credit Officer & Executive Vice President





Insider Actions


 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}


Date
Name
Shares
Transaction
Value





05/22/2017

Michael C. Crapps 
President & CEO; Director

444


 
Disposition at $20.1 per share.


8,924


05/22/2017

Michael C. Crapps 
President & CEO; Director

200


 
Disposition at $20.15 per share.


4,030


05/22/2017

Michael C. Crapps 
President & CEO; Director

900


 
Disposition at $20.35 per share.


18,315


05/19/2017

Michael C. Crapps 
President & CEO; Director

5,000


 
Disposition at $20 per share.


100,000


03/15/2017

Michael C. Crapps 
President & CEO; Director

6,247


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $20.7 per share.


129,312


03/15/2017

Joseph G. Sawyer 
Exec VP Chief Financial Off

2,951


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $20.7 per share.


61,085


03/15/2017

David K. Proctor 
Exec VP Chief Credit Officer

2,086


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $20.7 per share.


43,180


03/15/2017

J. Ted Nissen 
Exec VP Chief Banking Officer

2,431


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $20.7 per share.


50,321


03/15/2017

Robin D. Brown 
Exec VP HR and Marketing

1,868


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $20.7 per share.


38,667


02/22/2017

George H. Fann 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Michael C. Crapps 
President & CEO; Director

845


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Mitchell M. Willoughby 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Chimin Jimmy Chao 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Joseph G. Sawyer 
Exec VP Chief Financial Off

353


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

James Thomas Johnson 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

David K. Proctor 
Exec VP Chief Credit Officer

309


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Paul S. Simon 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

J. Ted Nissen 
Exec VP Chief Banking Officer

324


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Thomas Carlton Brown 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

O. A. Ethridge 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

E. Leland Reynolds 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Anita B. Easter 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

J. Randolph Potter 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Robin D. Brown 
Exec VP HR and Marketing

272


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Roderick M. Todd 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

W. James Kitchens 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Richard K. Bogan 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


02/22/2017

Alexander Snipe 
Director

245


 
Acquisition at $0 per share.


0


12/31/2016

George H. Fann 
Director

4


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


12/31/2016

Mitchell M. Willoughby 
Director

1,247


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


12/31/2016

James Thomas Johnson 
Director

167


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


12/31/2016

J. Randolph Potter 
Director

42


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


12/31/2016

W. James Kitchens 
Director

1,910


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


12/31/2016

Alexander Snipe 
Director

2,135


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


10/26/2016

George H. Fann 
Director

2,205


 
Acquisition at $14.9 per share.


32,854


09/22/2016

George H. Fann 
Director

2,600


 
Acquisition at $14.9 per share.


38,740


09/22/2016

O. A. Ethridge 
Director

100


 
Disposition at $15.44 per share.


1,544


09/21/2016

O. A. Ethridge 
Director

100


 
Disposition at $15.48 per share.


1,548


09/20/2016

O. A. Ethridge 
Director

500


 
Disposition at $15.31 per share.


7,655


09/16/2016

Roderick M. Todd 
Director

900


 
Disposition at $14.92 per share.


13,428








/news/latest/company/us/fcco

      MarketWatch News on FCCO
    




 U.S. Treasury sells shares in four banks
12:58 p.m. Aug. 24, 2012
 - MarketWatch.com




 Treasury gives $2.9 bln to 23 regional banks
5:38 p.m. Nov. 25, 2008
 - Greg Robb




 First Community Corp starts at market perform - Ryan Beck
12:57 p.m. Nov. 27, 2006
 - Leslie Wines




 First Community OKs buyback of up to 150,000 shares
11:43 a.m. June 30, 2006
 - Gabriel Madway




 First Community OKs stock buyback up to 150K shares
11:36 a.m. June 30, 2006
 - Gabriel Madway




 First Community shares up 1.8% at $18.06
11:37 a.m. June 30, 2006
 - Gabriel Madway




 First Community to buy DeKalb Bankshares for $9.9M
10:05 a.m. Dec. 8, 2005
 - Ciara Linnane




 Updates, advisories and surprises
12:01 a.m. Oct. 21, 2004
 - CBS.MarketWatch.com




 First Community posts higher Q3 profits
11:50 a.m. Oct. 20, 2004
 - Heather Wilson




 First Community Corp. Q3 earns 29c vs 27c
11:46 a.m. Oct. 20, 2004
 - Heather Wilson




 First Community Corp. Q3 interest income $2.9M vs $2.5M
11:46 a.m. Oct. 20, 2004
 - Heather Wilson




 First Community, DutchFork shareholder approve merger
12:45 p.m. Sept. 1, 2004
 - Heather Wilson




 First Community, DutchFork shareholders OK merger
12:38 p.m. Sept. 1, 2004
 - Heather Wilson




 First Community to buy DutchFork in $50 mln deal
9:18 a.m. April 13, 2004
 - Ciara Linnane









/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/fcco

      Other News on FCCO
    




 10-Q: FIRST COMMUNITY CORP /SC/
9:39 a.m. May 9, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Top Ranked Momentum Stocks to Buy for April 13th

8:37 a.m. April 13, 2017
 - Zacks.com





Is First Community (FCCO) Stock a Solid Choice Right Now?

8:42 a.m. April 4, 2017
 - Zacks.com





Dividend Champions For February 2017

6:56 a.m. Feb. 1, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





First Community (FCCO) Shares March Higher, Can It Continue?

9:32 a.m. Jan. 26, 2017
 - Zacks.com





Dividend Challengers (And Near-Challengers): 66 Increases Expected By The End Of February

6:06 a.m. Dec. 16, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Dividend Challengers (And Near-Challengers): 38 Increases Expected In The Next 10 Weeks

12:05 a.m. Nov. 22, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha




 10-Q: FIRST COMMUNITY CORP /SC/
11:37 a.m. Nov. 10, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-Q: FIRST COMMUNITY CORP /SC/
5:18 p.m. Aug. 11, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





3 Regional Banks on the Move (BANR FCCO HAFC)

3:00 p.m. July 21, 2016
 - InvestorPlace.com





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – GROW WPG VHC SGM

4:15 p.m. June 8, 2016
 - InvestorPlace.com





Biggest Movers in Finance Stocks Now – FIG WRLD BFR OFG

6:00 a.m. Feb. 5, 2016
 - InvestorPlace.com





Hottest Finance Stocks Now – CORR GNW CFCB VRNG

12:00 p.m. Dec. 23, 2015
 - InvestorPlace.com





Biggest Movers in Finance Stocks Now – ONDK AFCB OFG FCCO

5:15 a.m. Dec. 21, 2015
 - InvestorPlace.com





Biggest Movers in Finance Stocks Now – FCCO FULT WRLD KINS

1:00 p.m. Oct. 21, 2015
 - InvestorPlace.com





United Community Banks Reaches 52-Week High - Analyst Blog

4:24 p.m. Nov. 21, 2013
 - Zacks.com





First NBC Bank Holding Upped to Strong Buy   - Analyst Blog

11:40 a.m. Nov. 18, 2013
 - Zacks.com





BNC Bancorp (BNCN) Worth Watching: Stock Moves 5.3% Higher - Analyst Blog

10:05 a.m. Nov. 11, 2013
 - Zacks.com





Cosi Inc Part Owner Buys 96K Shares and 5 Insider Buys to Note

9:43 a.m. Oct. 24, 2013
 - Wall St. Cheat Sheet





SY Bancorp Director Buys 150 Shares and 4 Insider Buys to Note

9:13 a.m. Sept. 23, 2013
 - Wall St. Cheat Sheet


Loading more headlines...












At a Glance

First Community Corp. (South Carolina)
5455 Sunset Boulevard


Lexington, South Carolina 29072-9161




Phone
1 8039512265


Industry
Banking


Sector
Financial Services


Fiscal Year-end
12/2017


View SEC Filings




Revenue
$38.91M


Net Income
$6.68M


2016 Sales Growth 
2.9%


Employees

        202.00


Annual Report for FCCO











/news/pressrelease/company/us/fcco

      Press Releases on FCCO
    




 First Community Corporation Announces Second Quarter Results and Cash Dividend
9:00 a.m. July 19, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Ed Tarver Elected to First Community Board of Directors
3:00 p.m. May 17, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 First Community Corporation Announces First Quarter Results and Cash Dividend
9:00 a.m. April 19, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 First Community Corporation to Expand Upstate South Carolina Presence
9:00 a.m. April 12, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 First Community Corporation Announces Record Earnings and Increased Cash Dividend
10:00 a.m. Jan. 18, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 First Community Corporation Announces Third Quarter Results and Cash Dividend
9:00 a.m. Oct. 19, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF











Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




1:42 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
1:40pHow your pet could make you a target for scammers
1:39pOil sets sights on biggest weekly gain of the year
1:38pAugust gold climbs $8.40, or 0.7%, to settle at $1,268.40.oz
1:38pGold prices log highest finish since mid-June, up 1.1% for the week
1:34pStitch Fix has confidentially filed to go public: report
1:32pCan China make the reflation trade great again?
1:31pGet ready for the less-profitable Amazon that you used to know 
1:30pMattel stock price target cut to $19 from $22 at MKM Partners
1:29pElectronic Arts stock price target raised to $132 from $126 at MKM Partners
1:28pExxon Mobil stock price target cut to $83 from $86 at CFRA
1:28pThe states where people spend the most on lotto tickets
1:28pTempur Sealy stock price target raised to $62 from $50 at CFRA
1:27pFiat Chrysler gets approval to sell diesel cars
1:26pStarbucks’ Teavana stores are the latest casualty at the mall
1:25pHigh Times is going public through a deal with a blank-check company — and here’s what that means
1:25pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
1:25pFoxconn’s history of broken promises casts a shadow on Wisconsin news
1:24pTesla’s Model 3 will be launched with panache--and a party--later Friday
1:16pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
1:14pBaker Hughes data show weekly U.S. oil-rig count up a third time this month
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,803.62

+7.07
+0.03%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,375.78

-6.41
-0.10%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,470.15

-5.27
-0.21%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15





























































Sample Employee Benefits Plan Agreement, Employee Benefits Plan Contracts - Free Legal Documents (page 1 Of 248)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Employee Benefits Plan Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>








Sample Employee Benefits Plan Agreements 





	These Employee Benefits Plan Agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) ENTERPRISE SERVICES EXECUTIVE DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN (Effective April 1, 2017)Parties: DXC TECHNOLOGY CO 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Virginia
2) DXC TECHNOLOGY COMPANY 2017 NON-EMPLOYEE DIRECTOR INCENTIVE PLANParties: DXC TECHNOLOGY CO | DXC Technology Company | Everett SpinCo, Inc | Hewlett Packard Enterprise Company 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Nevada
3) DXC TECHNOLOGY COMPANY DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN AND SUMMARY PLAN DESCRIPTION Effective as of April 1, 2017Parties: DXC TECHNOLOGY CO | DXC TECHNOLOGY COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
4) CAMPBELL SOUP COMPANY SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLANParties: CAMPBELL SOUP CO | CAMPBELL SOUP COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New Jersey
5) PAR PACIFIC HOLDINGS, INC. NON-QUALIFIED DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN Effective as of March 7, 2017Parties: PAR PACIFIC HOLDINGS, INC. | Par Pacific Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 3/8/2017

6) AUTONATION, INC. 2017 EMPLOYEE EQUITY AND INCENTIVE PLANParties: AUTONATION, INC. | AUTONATION, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
7) Schwab Retirement Plan Services, Inc. Profit Sharing / 401(k) Non-Standardized Adoption Agreement #001 For Use With Defined Contribution Prototype Basic Plan #03Parties: LMI AEROSPACE INC | Charles Schwab Bank Charles Schwab Bank | LMI Aerospace, Inc | Schwab Retirement Plan Services, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 3/3/2017

8) MAYFIELD HEIGHTS, OHIO ? March 3, 2017 ? Materion Corporation (NYSE:MTRN) announced today its Board of Directors has completed the planned succession of its top leadership with the appointment of Richard J. Hipple, 64, Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company since 2006, to ExeParties: MATERION CORP | MATERION CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/3/2017

9) Second Amendment to the Weingarten Realty Retirement PlanParties: WEINGARTEN REALTY INVESTORS /TX/ 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

10) WEC ENERGY GROUP EXECUTIVE DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLANParties: WEC ENERGY GROUP, INC. | Legacy Wisconsin Energy Corporation | WEC Energy Group, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Wisconsin
11) ARCONIC DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN (as amended and restated August 1, 2016)Parties: ARCONIC INC. | Alcoa Inc | Alcoa USA Corp 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Pennsylvania
12) RETIREMENT AGREEMENTParties: TRAVELCENTERS OF AMERICA LLC | America LLC | TA Operating LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Ohio
13) WEC ENERGY GROUP DIRECTORS' DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLANParties: WEC ENERGY GROUP, INC. | Legacy Wisconsin Energy Corporation | WEC Energy Group, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Wisconsin
14) DNB FIRST SUCCESS-SHARING SUPPLEMENTAL EXECUTIVE RETIREMENT PLAN BASIC PLAN DOCUMENTParties: DNB FINANCIAL CORP /PA/ 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

15) ARCONIC SUPPLEMENTAL PENSION PLAN FOR SENIOR EXECUTIVES (as amended and restated August 1, 2016)Parties: ARCONIC INC. | Alcoa Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

16) TRANSITION AND RETIREMENT AGREEMENTParties: NORTHROP GRUMMAN CORP /DE/ | NORTHROP GRUMMAN SYSTEMS CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Virginia
17) RETIREMENT AND CONSULTING AGREEMENTParties: CEMPRA, INC. | Authorized Member, Board | Cempra, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:North Carolina
18) PACKAGING CORPORATION OF AMERICA DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLANParties: PACKAGING CORP OF AMERICA | Packaging Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Illinois
19) RETIREMENT AND RELEASE AGREEMENTParties: XPO LOGISTICS, INC. | New Breed, Inc | XPO Logistics Supply Chain, Inc | XPO Logistics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

20) THIRD AMENDMENT TO THE SPECTRA ENERGY RETIREMENT SAVINGS PLANParties: ENBRIDGE INC | Spectra Energy Corp 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

21) SPECTRA ENERGY RETIREMENT SAVINGS PLAN (As Amended and Restated Effective as of January 1, 2014)Parties: ENBRIDGE INC | Duke Energy Corporation | EVP, Human Resources and Support Services | Spectra Energy Corp 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
22) SECOND AMENDMENT TO THE SPECTRA ENERGY RETIREMENT SAVINGS PLANParties: ENBRIDGE INC | Spectra Energy Corp 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

23) Exhibit 10.26 Encana Corporation Canadian Pension Plan Amended and Restated as of January 1, 2011Parties: ENCANA CORP | Encana Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

24) SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED NU SKIN ENTERPRISES, INC. DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLANParties: NU SKIN ENTERPRISES INC | NU SKIN ENTERPRISES, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

25) ENCANA (USA) R ETIREMENT PLANParties: ENCANA CORP | Encana Services Company Ltd 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

26) CERTIFICATE OF AMENDMENT TO THE ENCANA CORPORATION CANADIAN PENSION PLAN AMENDED AND RESTATED EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2011Parties: ENCANA CORP | Encana Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

27) CERTIFICATE OF AMENDMENT TO THE ENCANA CORPORATION CANADIAN PENSION PLAN AMENDED AND RESTATED EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2011Parties: ENCANA CORP | Encana Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

28) ALENCO INC. DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN Effective December 1, 2004 [Amended and Restated Effective January 1, 2009]Parties: ENCANA CORP | ALENCO INC | Tom Brown, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Colorado
29) THE J. M. SMUCKER COMPANY TOP MANAGEMENT SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT BENEFIT PLAN (JANUARY 1, 2018 RESTATEMENT)Parties: J M SMUCKER CO | J M Smucker Company Top Management 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Ohio
30) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO LINCOLN ELECTRIC HOLDINGS, INC. SUPPLEMENTAL EXECUTIVE RETIREMENT PLAN (AS AMENDED AND RESTATED AS OF DECEMBER 31, 2008)Parties: LINCOLN ELECTRIC HOLDINGS INC | LINCOLN ELECTRIC HOLDINGS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

31) PLUM CREEK TIMBER COMPANY, L.P. KEY EMPLOYEE SUPPLEMENTAL PENSION PLANParties: WEYERHAEUSER CO | PLUM CREEK TIMBER COMPANY, LP | PLUM CREEK TIMBER I, LLC | Plum Creek Timberlands, LP 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Washington
32) RESTORATION PLAN OF ROWAN COMPANIES, INC. (As Restated Effective January 1, 2013)Parties: ROWAN COMPANIES PLC | ROWAN COMPANIES, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

33) THE LINCOLN ELECTRIC COMPANY EMPLOYEE SAVINGS PLANParties: LINCOLN ELECTRIC HOLDINGS INC | Lincoln Electric Company 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

34) VWR INTERNATIONAL, LLC RETIREMENT PLAN (As Amended and Restated Effective January 1, 2015)Parties: VWR CORP | VWR International, Inc | VWR INTERNATIONAL, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Pennsylvania
35) SECOND AMENDMENT TO THE MARSH  MCLENNAN COMPANIES BENEFIT EQUALIZATION PLAN AND MARSH  MCLENNAN COMPANIES SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN AS RESTATED EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2012Parties: MARSH  MCLENNAN COMPANIES, INC. | Marsh  McLennan Companies, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

36) CINCINNATI BELL MANAGEMENT PENSION PLANParties: CINCINNATI BELL INC | CINCINNATI BELL MANAGEMENT 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

37) PLUM CREEK PENSION PLANParties: WEYERHAEUSER CO | Plum Creek Timber Company, LP | Plum Creek Timberlands, LP 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

38) FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE PINNACLE WEST CAPITAL CORPORATION SUPPLEMENTAL EXCESS BENEFIT RETIREMENT PLAN OF 2005Parties: ARIZONA PUBLIC SERVICE CO | Pinnacle West Capital Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

39) EARLY RETIREMENT AGREEMENT  RELEASEParties: GENERAL ELECTRIC CO 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
40) SECOND AMENDMENT TO AVALONBAY COMMUNITIES, INC. DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN As Amended and Restated Effective as of January 1, 2011Parties: AVALONBAY COMMUNITIES INC | AVALONBAY COMMUNITIES, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

41) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO THE VWR INTERNATIONAL, LLC RETIREMENT PLAN (As Amended and Restated Effective January 1, 2015)Parties: VWR CORP | VWR International, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

42) FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE MARSH  MCLENNAN COMPANIES BENEFIT EQUALIZATION PLAN AND MARSH  MCLENNAN COMPANIES SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN AS RESTATED EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2012Parties: MARSH  MCLENNAN COMPANIES, INC. | Marsh  McLennan Companies, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

43) Baxter International Inc. and Subsidiaries Deferred Compensation Plan (Amended and restated effective January 1, 2015)Parties: BAXTER INTERNATIONAL INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Illinois
44) BRADY CORPORATION DIRECTORS' DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN AS AMENDED AND RESTATED EFFECTIVE FEBRUARY 21, 2017Parties: BRADY CORP | 2005, Brady Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Wisconsin
45) iHEARTMEDIA, INC. 2017 KEY EMPLOYEE INCENTIVE PLANParties: IHEARTMEDIA, INC. | iHEARTMEDIA, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
46) SUPPLEMENTAL EXECUTIVE RETIREMENT PLAN - BParties: LSC COMMUNICATIONS, INC. | MOORE CORPORATION LIMITED | SUBSIDIARY COMPANIES 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Connecticut
47) FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE EMPLOYEE SAVINGS PLAN OF IDAHO POWER COMPANYParties: IDACORP INC | IDAHO POWER COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

48) THIRD AMENDMENT TO ERIE INSURANCE GROUP RETIREMENT PLAN FOR EMPLOYEES (As Amended and Restated Effective December 31, 2014)Parties: ERIE INDEMNITY CO | Erie Indemnity Company | ERIE INSURANCE GROUP 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

49) FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE BAXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN (Amended and Restated as of January 1, 2015)Parties: BAXTER INTERNATIONAL INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

50) BAXTER INTERNATIONAL INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES PENSION PLAN (Amended and Restated Effective as of January 1, 2016)Parties: BAXTER INTERNATIONAL INC | Baxalta Incorporated 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778798081828384858687888990919293949596979899100101102103104105106107108109110111112113114115116117118119120121122123124125126127128129130131132133134135136137138139140141142143144145146147148149150151152153154155156157158159160161162163164165166167168169170171172173174175176177178179180181182183184185186187188189190191192193194195196197198199200201202203204205206207208209210211212213214215216217218219220221222223224225226227228229230231232233234235236237238239240241242243244245246247248249250251252253254255256257258259260261262263264265266267 
 
 

 




















Personal Banking, Mortgages, Loans & Financial Planning | First Community Bank























Toggle navigation







Log In
Business
Personal
Meet Your Team
About
Locations
Careers
Contact









Online banking Log in 





personal









Skip to Content
Accessible Site Map




Business 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Business Products
Employee IRAs






Borrow

Business Lending

Loans & Lines of Credit
Construction & Mortgage
Equipment Financing





Plan

Business Planning

Manage Cash Flow
Address Immediate Needs
Plan for Tomorrow







Explore All Business Services




Personal 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Convenience Products






Borrow

Mortgages

New Home Loans
Refinance
Jumbo Loans





Plan

Retirement and Financial Planning

Major Life Changes
Managing an Inheritance







Explore All Personal Services




Meet Your Team






Mortgage
                                                    Lenders

We think buying a home should be filled with joy and expectation.
 
Find lenders in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Barnwell County
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 






Commercial Bankers

We help local businesses and organizations manage their finances. 
 
Find bankers in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 





Financial
                                                    Planners

We offer understanding and direction for your financial future.
 
All planners







Don't see what you are looking for? Give us a call. 803.951.2265


















Personal









Bank
Online Banking

Checking Accounts

Free Checking
Personal Checking
Personal Interest Checking
Premium Interest Checking
Heritage Account



Savings Accounts

Regular Savings
Premium Savings
Certificate Of Deposit
Money Market Select
Health Savings Account
Young Saver


Convenience Products


Borrow

Mortgages

Online Mortgage Application


Loans
Credit Cards


Plan & Invest
IRAs
Retirement And Financial Planning


Sign Up for Online Banking

Order Checks


        Bank by Phone
        888.951.2265
    













Personal Online Banking



                                                    Log In
                                                    







Sign up for Online Banking
Online banking is a banking office with one customer: you.
Online Account Protection







Nothing's more important than your financial security — today and tomorrow.








Mortgages
I'm ready to buy.
Found the perfect home? We'll help you get there.
Meet our lenders



Loans
I need financing.
Make major purchases without sacrificing your security.









Let's talk. 803.951.2265







Checking Accounts

Free Checking
Online Banking & Bill Pay
Debit Cards

Compare Accounts




Savings Accounts

Premium Rate Savings
Overdraft Services
Certificates of Deposit

Compare Accounts




Individual Retirement Accounts
Ready to start saving for your happily ever after? All it takes is $100.






Don't worry. Be ready.
Want to sleep better tonight? Develop a retirement strategy today.

Here's How We Can Help


















Direct Access to Real People










Talk to Us
800.829.6372




Visit Us
Locations




Connect with Us
Contact






























Online Banking Log In & Sign Up | First Community Bank





















Toggle navigation







Log In
Business
Personal
Meet Your Team
About
Locations
Careers
Contact













Skip to Content
Accessible Site Map




Business 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Business Products
Employee IRAs






Borrow

Business Lending

Loans & Lines of Credit
Construction & Mortgage
Equipment Financing





Plan

Business Planning

Manage Cash Flow
Address Immediate Needs
Plan for Tomorrow







Explore All Business Services




Personal 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Convenience Products






Borrow

Mortgages

New Home Loans
Refinance
Jumbo Loans





Plan

Retirement and Financial Planning

Major Life Changes
Managing an Inheritance







Explore All Personal Services




Meet Your Team






Mortgage
                                                    Lenders

We think buying a home should be filled with joy and expectation.
 
Find lenders in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Barnwell County
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 






Commercial Bankers

We help local businesses and organizations manage their finances. 
 
Find bankers in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 





Financial
                                                    Planners

We offer understanding and direction for your financial future.
 
All planners







Don't see what you are looking for? Give us a call. 803.951.2265


















Online Banking



Select an account Type


                Business
            


                Personal
            





                    Log In 




                    Log In 






Pay your bills online.





Online Banking Security
                                We offer added protection to your online banking account.
                            
Learn More



SIGN UP FOR ONLINE BANKING

Personal Accounts
                            Online banking is a banking office with one customer: you.
                        
Sign Up Online



Business Accounts
                            To sign up, contact any banking office.
                        
Locations
















Direct Access to Real People










Talk to Us
800.829.6372




Visit Us
Locations




Connect with Us
Contact






























First Community Bank | Regional Business & Personal Banking in SC & GA





















Toggle navigation







Log In
Business
Personal
Meet Your Team
About
Locations
Careers
Contact








about








Skip to Content
Accessible Site Map




Business 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Business Products
Employee IRAs






Borrow

Business Lending

Loans & Lines of Credit
Construction & Mortgage
Equipment Financing





Plan

Business Planning

Manage Cash Flow
Address Immediate Needs
Plan for Tomorrow







Explore All Business Services




Personal 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Convenience Products






Borrow

Mortgages

New Home Loans
Refinance
Jumbo Loans





Plan

Retirement and Financial Planning

Major Life Changes
Managing an Inheritance







Explore All Personal Services




Meet Your Team







                                                    Mortgage
                                                    Lenders
                                                

We think buying a home should be filled with joy and expectation.
 
Find lenders in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Barnwell County
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 






Commercial Bankers

We help local businesses and organizations manage their finances. 
 
Find bankers in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 






                                                    Financial
                                                    Planners
                                                

We offer understanding and direction for your financial future.



All planners







Don't see what you are looking for? Give us a call. 803.951.2265


















About









About
Investors
News
Leadership



Order Checks

Bank by Phone
                888.951.2265








Modern banking with extra perks
                                like respect and a welcoming handshake.
Local businesses are the backbone of our economy. They are also the heart of our communities, providing jobs, goods and services, and familiar gathering spots for friends, neighbors, and business associates who come together to share ideas and create new alliances and opportunities that move us all forward.
At First Community Bank, it is our pleasure to meet the needs of these local businesses and their owners with thoughtful counsel, financing, and a full continuum of products and services designed just for them. As a true community bank, it is our mission to do it well. 









LEADERSHIP
Meet the men and women who lead our bank. 





INVESTORS
Data provided by SNL Financial.





NEWS
Read our recent news and happenings.







Our Story


1994
Michael Crapps and Jim Leventis have a conversation about a missing element in the Midlands financial market: a locally-owned bank focused on small businesses.


1995
First Community Bank launches with banking offices in two communities - Lexington and Forest Acres.


1998
A secondary stock offering raises $6.6 million to fund long-term growth strategies.


2001
Chapin office and staff are acquired from Newberry Federal Savings Bank.


2003
First Community Corporation (FCCO) trades on the NASDAQ SmallCap Market for the first time.


2004
First Community Bank and Newberry Federal Savings Bank merge.


2005
We celebrate our tenth anniversary the same year the South Carolina Chamber of Commerce names us one of the Fastest-Growing Companies in South Carolina.


2006
First Community Bank and Bank of Camden successfully merge.


2008
Offering a full continuum of financial planning services geared toward the needs of local professionals, First Community Financial Consultants opens its doors.


2010
Earnings rise a record 82.3% - from $960 thousand to $1.75 million - during the first nine months of the year.


2011
First Community Bank acquires Palmetto South Mortgage. Three years later, integration of the two units as First Community Bank Mortgage becomes complete.


2014
The bank expands its footprint into Aiken and Augusta through a merger with Savannah River Banking Company and a new banking office in the heart of downtown Columbia on Lady Street.


2015
First Community Bank celebrates its 20th anniversary and opens its 15th location in Blythewood.




















Direct Access to Real People










Talk to Us
800.829.6372




Visit Us
Locations




Connect with Us
Contact
































Business Banking, Lending and Planning | First Community Bank, SC & GA






















Toggle navigation







Log In
Business
Personal
Meet Your Team
About
Locations
Careers
Contact








Online banking Log in
                



business









Skip to Content
Accessible Site Map




Business 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Business Products
Employee IRAs






Borrow

Business Lending

Loans & Lines of Credit
Construction & Mortgage
Equipment Financing





Plan

Business Planning

Manage Cash Flow
Address Immediate Needs
Plan for Tomorrow







Explore All Business Services




Personal 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Convenience Products






Borrow

Mortgages

New Home Loans
Refinance
Jumbo Loans





Plan

Retirement and Financial Planning

Major Life Changes
Managing an Inheritance







Explore All Personal Services




Meet Your Team






Mortgage
                                                    Lenders

We think buying a home should be filled with joy and expectation.
 
Find lenders in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Barnwell County
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 






Commercial Bankers

We help local businesses and organizations manage their finances. 
 
Find bankers in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 





Financial
                                                    Planners

We offer understanding and direction for your financial future.


All planners







Don't see what you are looking for? Give us a call. 803.951.2265
















Business









Bank
Online Banking
Checking Accounts

Small Business Checking
Business Interest Checking
Business Analysis Checking
Community Pride Account
Interest On Lawyers Trust Account


Savings Accounts

Business Savings
Business Premium Savings
Money Market Select
Certificate Of Deposit


Business Products
Employee IRAs


Borrow
Business Lending
Credit Cards


Plan
Business Planning



Order Checks

Bank by Phone
                888.951.2265












Business Online Banking



                                                    Log In 







Sign up!
Contact any banking office to sign up.

Online Account Protection







 Deposit checks electronically right where you do business with Merchant Remote Deposit Capture.


                                        REMOTE CAPTURE LOG IN
                                        



Short-term opportunity? Long-range planning? Put our experience to work.








Business Lending
I need financing.
We're committed to local businesses and we have money to loan.
Meet our commercial bankers



Business Planning
I have questions.
From young entrepreneurs to seasoned professionals, we're here to help.









Let's talk. 803.951.2265







Business Checking

Free Online Banking & Bill Pay
No Per Check or Debit Fees
Debit & Credit Cards

Compare Accounts




Business Savings

Certificates of Deposit
Health Savings Account
Money Market Select Accounts

Compare Accounts




Business Products
Learn about useful services and tools that can help take your business to the next level.






Smart money asks for directions.
You've got questions about your retirement future. A financial planner could be the answer.

 Learn More 


















Direct Access to Real People










Talk to Us
800.829.6372




Visit Us
Locations




Connect with Us
Contact































First Community Bank | South Carolina & Georgia Business & Personal Banking























Toggle navigation







Log In
Business
Personal
Meet Your Team
About
Locations
Careers
Contact









Online banking Log in
                



business


personal









Skip to Content
Accessible Site Map




Business 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Business Products
Employee IRAs






Borrow

Business Lending

Loans & Lines of Credit
Construction & Mortgage
Equipment Financing





Plan

Business Planning

Manage Cash Flow
Address Immediate Needs
Plan for Tomorrow







Explore All Business Services




Personal 




Bank


Online Banking
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
Convenience Products






Borrow

Mortgages

New Home Loans
Refinance
Jumbo Loans





Plan

Retirement and Financial Planning

Major Life Changes
Managing an Inheritance







Explore All Personal Services




Meet Your Team






Mortgage
                                                    Lenders

We think buying a home should be filled with joy and expectation.
 
Find lenders in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Barnwell County
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 






Commercial Bankers

We help local businesses and organizations manage their finances. 
 
Find bankers in:


--Select Location--
All locations
Aiken
Augusta
Blythewood
Camden
Cayce-West Columbia
Central Savannah River Area
Chapin
Downtown Columbia
Forest Acres
Gilbert
Greenville
Irmo
Lexington
Newberry
Northeast
Prosperity
Red Bank



 





Financial
                                                    Planners

We offer understanding and direction for your financial future.


All planners







Don't see what you are looking for? Give us a call. 803.951.2265
















We lend local.
No outside approvals. No lag time. Just capital, convenience and face-to-face conversation.
GET STARTED


Online Banking



Select an account Type


                Business
            


                Personal
            





                    Log In 




                    Log In 





Sign Up 













Smart move.

You don’t want a mortgage. You want the right mortgage, starting with the right mortgage lender.
LET’S TALK









Welcome Cornerstone customers.

This fall, Cornerstone National Bank and First Community Bank will officially join forces.
LEARN MORE 















Meet Your Team
All Commercial Bankers









All Commercial Bankers






Ryan Barnes
Commercial Banker
NMLS#643065


Forest Acres

rbarnes@firstcommunitysc.com
803.760.1552



Backyard Guru
When not volunteering civically, this Columbia native can probably be found working in the yard, grilling on the back deck or cheering on his alma mater, the Gamecocks.














Direct Access to Real People










Talk to Us
800.829.6372




Visit Us
Locations




Connect with Us
Contact























